Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.900

Savings—1961 c 256.

This chapter shall not repeal, amend or modify chapter 15.66 RCW, or any other law providing for the marketing of agricultural commodities and/or providing for marketing agreements or orders for such agricultural commodities, which shall be in existence on the date this act becomes effective.

[ 1961 c 256 s 65.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The effective date of this act was midnight June 7, 1961, see preface 1961 session laws.